Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.005

Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare, and to provide for state administrative control, supervision, licensure, and regulation of the practice of physical therapy. It is the intent of the legislature that only individuals who meet and maintain prescribed standards of competence and conduct be allowed to engage in the practice of physical therapy as defined and authorized by this chapter.

[ 2005 c 501 s 1; 1983 c 116 s 1.]